Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,281
Tampering with anhydrous ammonia or anhydrous ammonia equipment; effect on liability.

(1) Any person who owns, maintains, or installs anhydrous ammonia equipment, uses anhydrous ammonia for any lawful purpose, sells anhydrous ammonia for any lawful purposes, or transports anhydrous ammonia in a manner prescribed by law shall not be liable to any person who tampers with, or assists in tampering with, such anhydrous ammonia, or such anhydrous ammonia equipment, for personal injury, wrongful death, or any other economic or noneconomic damages arising out of such tampering, unless such liability is a result of the willful, wanton, reckless, or intentional acts or omissions of such person.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Anhydrous ammonia equipment means any equipment used in the application of anhydrous ammonia for agricultural purposes that meets all applicable safety requirements established by state and federal statutes and regulations or any container or storage facility used to store anhydrous ammonia in a manner that meets all applicable safety requirements established by state and federal statutes and regulations; and

(b) Tampering with anhydrous ammonia means intentionally, knowingly, and unlawfully gaining access or attempting to gain access to anhydrous ammonia or anhydrous ammonia equipment.

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 9.